lt-LT: Kamuolio gręžimo būsena: Išgręžta pagal užsakymą; Iš anksto išgręžta; Neišgręžta; Kita
zh-CN: 球钻状态: 定制钻孔; 预钻孔; 未钻孔; 其他
hu: Labda fúrási állapota: Egyedileg fúrt; Előrefúrt; Fúratlan; Egyéb
ja: ボールドリル状態: カスタムドリル; ドリル済み; ドリルなし; その他
ru: Сверление шаров: С индивидуальным сверлением; Предварительно просверленный; Без сверления; Другое
zh-TW: 球類鑽孔狀態: 訂製鑽孔; 預鑽孔; 未鑽孔; 其他
da: Kugleboringstilstand: Specialboret; Forboret; Uboret; Andet
en: Ball drilling state: Custom-drilled; Pre-drilled; Undrilled; Other
sk-SK: Stav vŕtania gulí: Vŕtané na mieru; Predvŕtané; Nevŕtané; Iný
hr-HR: Stanje izbušenih rupa: Izbušeno po narudžbi; Unaprijed izbušeno; Neizbušeno; Ostalo
pt-PT: Estado de perfuração da bola: Perfurado à medida; Pré-perfurado; Sem perfuração; Outro
tr: Top deliği durumu: Özel delinmiş; Önceden delinmiş; Delinmemiş; Diğer
vi: Trạng thái khoan lỗ trên bóng: Khoan theo yêu cầu; Khoan sẵn; Chưa khoan; Khác
th: สถานะการเจาะลูกบอล: เจาะรูแบบกำหนดเอง; เจาะรูล่วงหน้า; ไม่เจาะรู; อื่นๆ
sv: Klotets håldesign: Specialborrad; Förborrad; Oborrad; Övrigt
bg-BG: Състояние на пробиване на топката: Пробита по поръчка; Предварително пробита; Непробита; Друго
ro-RO: Stare de găurire a mingii: Găurit la comandă; Pregăurit; Negăurit; Altele
cs: Stav vyvrtání koule: Vrtáno na míru; Předvrtáno; Nevrtáno; Jiné
nb: Kuleboringstilstand: Spesialboret; Forhåndsboret; Uten hull; Annet
el: Κατάσταση διάνοιξης οπών μπάλας: Προσαρμοσμένο τρύπημα; Προτρυπημένη; Χωρίς τρύπες; Άλλο
ko: 볼 타공 상태: 맞춤형 드릴 구멍; 사전 드릴 가공; 미가공; 기타
pt-BR: Estado de perfuração da bola: Furação personalizada; Pré-furada; Sem furação; Outro
it: Stato di foratura del pallone: Foratura personalizzata; Preforata; Non forata; Altro
sl-SI: Stanje prevrtanosti žogice: Izvrtano po meri; Predhodno izvrtano; Neizvrtano; Drugo
nl: Balboor status: Op maat geboord; Voorgeboord; Ongeboord; Overig
de: Bohrzustand des Balls: Individuell gebohrt; Vorgebohrt; Ungebohrt; Sonstige
fr: État de perçage de la boule: Percé sur mesure; Prépercé; Non percé; Autre
pl: Stan wiercenia piłki: Nawiercana na zamówienie; Wstępnie nawiercana; Nienawiercana; Inne
fi: Poraus: Mittatilaustyönä porattu; Esiporattu; Poraamaton; Muu
es: Estado de perforación de la bola: Perforación personalizada; Preperforado; Sin perforar; Otro